Washington statutes.
RCW 4.32.250

Effect of minor defects in pleading.

A notice or other paper is valid and effectual though the title of the action in which it is made is omitted, or it is defective either in respect to the court or parties, if it intelligently refers to such action or proceedings; and in furtherance of justice upon proper terms, any other defect or error in any notice or other paper or proceeding may be amended by the court, and any mischance, omission or defect relieved within one year thereafter; and the court may enlarge or extend the time, for good cause shown, within which by statute any act is to be done, proceeding had or taken, notice or paper filed or served, or may, on such terms as are just, permit the same to be done or supplied after the time therefor has expired.

[ 1988 c 202 s 2; 1893 c 127 s 24; RRS s 250.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 6(b), RAP 5.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.